Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB812.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56APROTECTING HOSPITAL WORKERS FROMWORKPLACE VIOLENCE GRANT PROGRAMSec.56A01. Definitions.56A02. Establishment of program.56A03. Application and review process.56A04. Allocation of grant awards.123456789101112131415161718 56A05. Reports.56A06. Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Fund.56A07. Expiration.§ 56A01. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." An application for a grant under the program."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." A hospital or freestanding emergency medical care facility that submits an application to the department for a grant under the program."Eligible project." A security enhancement designed to protect the safety and security of health care workers in a hospital or freestanding emergency medical care facility in this Commonwealth."Freestanding emergency medical care facility." A facility, structurally separate and distinct from a hospital, that receives an individual and provides emergency care."Fund." The Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Fund established under section 56A06 (relating to Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Fund)."Health care worker." An employee, independent contractor, licensee or other individual authorized to provide services in a hospital or a freestanding emergency medical care facility."Hospital." An institution having an organized medical staff that is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of physicians, diagnostic and therapeutic services or rehabilitation services for the care or 20250HB0812PN0842 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rehabilitation of injured, disabled, pregnant, diseased, sick or mentally ill persons. The term includes a facility for the diagnosis and treatment of disorders within the scope of specific medical specialties. The term does not include a facility caring exclusively for the mentally ill."Program." The Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Program established under section 56A02 (relating to establishment of program).§ 56A02. Establishment of program. The Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Program is established within the department to award grants to fund innovative approaches aimed at reducing verbal and physical violence against health care workers in hospitals or freestanding emergency medical care facilities. The department shall administer the program.§ 56A03. Application and review process. (a) Application process.--The department shall establish an application process for the award of grants under the program no later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection. An eligible applicant shall include all of the following information in an application:(1) A detailed explanation of the eligible applicant's eligible project, including all of the following information:(i) A timeline for development and implementation of the eligible project.(ii) A description of the population identified to participate in the eligible project.(iii) A detailed budget for the eligible project.(iv) Other information regarding the administration and support for the eligible project.20250HB0812PN0842 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Documentation on how the eligible project will achieve the goals of reducing verbal and physical violence against health care workers.(3) Performance metrics for measuring short-term and long-term outcomes of the eligible project, including a measure of the change in the severity and frequency of verbal and physical violence against health care workers.(b) Priority for selection.--The department shall prioritize the award of grants under the program to applications that demonstrate an innovative approach to reducing verbal and physical violence against health care workers, including any of the following:(1) Evidence supporting the conceptual foundation of the eligible project.(2) Evidence of an institutional commitment to reduce workplace violence against health care workers.(3) Evidence of institutional support for the eligible project, including staff time, access to institutional resources or financial resources.(4) A d escription of a plan for the long-term sustainability of the eligible project.(c) Initial application period.--No later than March 1, 2025, the department shall begin accepting applications from eligible applicants for available grants under the program during the fiscal year. The department shall provide notice of the application period on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Additional application period.--If money is available in the fund, no later than October 1, 2025, and each October 1 thereafter, the department shall accept applications from 20250HB0812PN0842 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligible applicants for available grants under the program during the applicable fiscal year. The department shall provide notice of a new application period on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(e) Review process.--The department shall review applications and award grants under the program on a rolling basis. No later than 90 days after a completed application is received from an eligible applicant, the department shall review and approve or deny the application. An eligible applicant may revise and resubmit a denied application to the department.§ 56A04. Allocation of grant awards. T he following shall apply to grant awards under the program: (1) Subject to paragraphs (2), (3) and (4), as follows:(i) The minimum grant amount awarded to a grant recipient in a fiscal year shall be no less than $10,000.(ii) The maximum grant amount awarded to a grant recipient in a fiscal year may not exceed $200,000.(2) The department may not require non-State financial participation from a grant recipient for a requested grant amount that is $25,000 or less.(3) The department may award a grant between $25,001 and $75,000 if the grant recipient provides non-State financial participation equal to 33% of the requested grant amount.(4) The department may award a grant between $75,001 and $200,000 if the grant recipient provides non-State financial participation equal to 50% of the requested grant amount.§ 56A05. Reports. No less than annually, the department shall post a report describing the grants awarded under the program, including the amount of the grants, the purpose of the grants and the outcome 20250HB0812PN0842 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reported by each grant recipient. No less than annually, each grant recipient shall provide a report to the department with all of the following information:(1) Activities funded through the grant awards.(2) The change in the severity and frequency of verbal and physical violence against health care workers.(3) The performance of the eligible projects based on stated performance metrics.(4) Budget expenditures. § 56A06. Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Protecting Hospital Workers from Workplace Violence Grant Fund is established as a fund in the State Treasury.(b) Appropriation.--All money deposited in the fund and the interest the money accrues is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.(c) Transfers.--In addition to any money deposited into the fund for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, from money appropriated to the department for general government operations, $5,000,000 is transferred to the fund.§ 56A07. Expiration.The authority of the department to award grants under the program shall expire July 1, 2035.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0812PN0842 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425